src-fst-morphology-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
Adjective inflection
The VÕRO language adjectives compare.

LEXICON A_1HANS1A  1 hanśa:hanśa

LEXICON A_1HERRAE  1 herrä:herrä

LEXICON A_2ARTIKLI  suhvli:suhvli
* Yaml: **suhvli**

LEXICON A_2KERGE  1 kerge:

LEXICON A_3ALADU  aladu:aladu
* Yaml: **A-aladu**

LEXICON A_3PERAEDUE  perädü:perädü
* Yaml: **A-peraedue**

LEXICON A_4AINUS   ainus:ainus

* LEXICON A_8KULDNW  kuldnõ:kuld
* LEXICON A_8KIIL1NE  kiiĺne:ki̬i̬ĺ
* LEXICON A_8KOLMAS  kolmas:kolma

* LEXICON A_8VIIES  viies:viie

* LEXICON A_9ALLAS1 

* LEXICON A_9SINNEL1 

* LEXICON A_9TAHHE 

* LEXICON A_9HERRE 

* LEXICON A_9KIPWN1/ELLAEI  what is this
* Yaml: **ellaei, suhvli**

* LEXICON A_9SALLAI  what is this
* Yaml: **ellaei, suhvli**
* Yaml: **ellaei, suhvli**

* Yaml: **ellaei, suhvli**

* Yaml: **allwv1, kipwn1**

* Yaml: **villw**

* Yaml: **tukwv**

* Yaml: **verrev**

* Yaml: **sallai**

LEXICON A_11AINWQ  ainõq:ainõ

LEXICON A_11KELMEQ  kelmeq:kelme

LEXICON A_13ALONW  alonõ:alo

LEXICON A_13TAEHINE  tähine:tähi

LEXICON A_13TAEHINE_PL  tähine:tähi

LEXICON A_14RITS1KAS   ritśkas:ritśka%{sØ%}

LEXICON A_14HAMMAS   rikas:ri%{kØ%}ka%{sØ%}

LEXICON A_14IKAES   rikas:ri%{kØ%}ka%{sØ%}

LEXICON A_16ABILINW  inemine:inemi
LEXICON A_16INEMINE  inemine:inemi

LEXICON A_19ALOMANW  alomanõ:aloma

LEXICON A_19PEDAEJAENE  pedäjäne:pedäjä

LEXICON A_19PEDAEJAENE_PL  pedäjäne:pedäjä

LEXICON A_22VWROKWNW  võrokõnõ:võrokõ

LEXICON A_22VAEHAEKENE  võrokõnõ:võrokõ

gradation: no

gradation: yes

gradation: no

* LEXICON A_2KASUNUQ  kasunuq:kasunu
* LEXICON A_2ELAENUEQ  elänüq:elänü

* +Err/Dial+Pl+Com:id%{eõ%}ga K ;  no q

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-vro/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc)</small>

---
